Missouri, session 2026, SB938.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 59.319 and 60.590, RSMo, are repealed
and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 59.319 and 60.590, to read as follows:
59.319. 1. A user fee of [four] six dollars shall be
charged and collected by every recorder in this state, over
and above any other fees required by law, as a condition
precedent to the recording of any instrument. The state
portion of the fee shall be forwarded monthly by each
recorder of deeds to the state director of revenue, and the
fees so forwarded shall be deposited by the director in the
state treasury. [Two] Three dollars of such fee shall be
retained by the recorder and deposited in a recorder's fund
and not in county general revenue for record storage,
microfilming, and preservation, including anything
necessarily pertaining thereto. The recorder's funds shall
be kept in a special fund by the treasurer and shall be
budgeted and expended at the direction of the recorder and
shall not be used to substitute for or subsidize any
allocation of general revenue for the operation of the
recorder's office without the express consent of the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 938 2
recorder. The recorder's fund may be audited by the
appropriate auditing agency, and any unexpended balance
shall be left in the fund to accumulate from year to year
with interest.
2. An additional fee of three dollars shall be charged
and collected by every recorder in this state, over and
above any other fees required by law, as a condition
precedent to the recording of any instruments specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 1 of section 59.330.
The fees collected from this additional three dollars per
recorded instrument shall be forwarded monthly by each
recorder of deeds to the state director of revenue, and the
fees so forwarded shall be deposited by the director in the
state treasury.
3. The state treasurer and the commissioner of
administration shall establish an appropriate account within
the state treasury and in accordance with the state's
accounting methods. Any receipt required by this section to
be deposited in the state treasury shall be credited as
follows:
(1) The amount of [one dollar] two dollars for each
fee collected under subsection 1 of this section shall be
paid to the state treasurer and credited to the "Missouri
Land Survey Fund" which is hereby created to be utilized for
the purposes of sections 60.510 to 60.620 and section
60.670. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund
and may approve disbursements from the fund in accordance
with sections 30.170 and 30.180. Any funds previously
collected by the state treasurer to be utilized for the
purposes of sections 60.510 to 60.620 and section 60.670
shall transfer to the Missouri land survey fund. Any
portion of the fund not immediately needed for the purposes

SB 938 3
authorized shall be invested by the state treasurer as
provided by the constitution and laws of this state. All
income, interest, and moneys earned from such investments
shall be deposited in the Missouri land survey fund. Any
unexpended balance in the fund at the end of the fiscal year
is exempt from the provisions of section 33.080 relating to
the transfer of unexpended balances to the general revenue
fund;
(2) The amount of one dollar for each fee collected
under subsection 1 of this section to an account to be
utilized by the secretary of state for additional
preservation of local records; and
(3) The amount of three dollars collected under
subsection 2 of this section into the Missouri housing trust
fund as designated in section 215.034.
60.590. 1. On request of the department of
agriculture or the state land surveyor, all city and county
recorders of deeds, together with all departments, boards or
agencies of state government, county, or city government,
shall furnish to the department of agriculture or the state
land surveyor certified copies of desired records which are
in their custody. This service shall be free of cost when
possible; otherwise, it shall be at actual cost of
reproduction of the records. On the same basis of cost, the
department of agriculture shall furnish records within its
custody to other agencies or departments of state, county or
city, certifying them.
2. The department of agriculture may produce,
reproduce and sell maps, plats, reports, studies, and
records, and shall establish by rule the fees necessary to
reflect the costs associated with the production and
reproduction under this section. The commission shall

SB 938 4
recommend to the department of agriculture the charges
therefor. All income received shall be promptly deposited
in the state treasury to the credit of the department of
agriculture land survey revolving services fund. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓